Vermont, session 2025-2026, S221.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act shall henceforth be known as the “Civics Strengthens Democracy
Act.”
Sec. 2. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Neglect for civics in our elementary and secondary education system
has contributed to polarization, distrust in institutions, and a citizenry and
VT LEG #385738 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.221
2026 Page 2 of 14
electorate who are poorly prepared to understand, appreciate, and use our form
of government and civic life.
(2) All students need to have the civic knowledge, skills, dispositions,
and behaviors necessary to participate in, preserve, and strengthen our
republic.
(3) Vermont should embrace civic education that:
(A) inspires students to want to become involved in their
constitutional democracy and help to sustain our republic;
(B) tells a full and complete narrative of America’s plural, yet shared,
story;
(C) celebrates the compromises needed to make our constitutional
democracy work;
(D) cultivates civic honesty and reflective patriotism that leaves
space to both love and critique this country;
(E) is relevant and engaging for students and teaches history and
civics in an integrated and inquiry-based manner; and
(F) teaches history and civics through a timeline of events and themes
that run through those events.
(4) Students who experience comprehensive, high-quality civic
education are more likely to vote and discuss politics at home, complete
college and develop employable skills, volunteer, and work on community
VT LEG #385738 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.221
2026 Page 3 of 14
issues and are more confident in their ability to speak publicly and
communicate with their elected representatives.
(5) The civic strength of our country relies on prioritizing and investing
in quality, comprehensive civic learning for the next generation of civic
participants.
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 914 is added to read:
§ 914. CIVIC EDUCATION
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Agency” means the Agency of Education.
(2) “Civic seal” means a recognition awarded by school districts to
individual students who have demonstrated civic excellence through their high
school project-based assessment and related coursework.
(3) “Civics” means a nonpartisan educational program that addresses:
(A) civic knowledge, which includes the acquisition of knowledge,
including an understanding of the history, heritage, civic life, and civic
institutions of the United States;
(B) civic skills, which includes the acquisition of skills, such as the
ability to analyze text and determine the reliability of sources, as well as an
understanding of the ways in which civic institutions operate and how
individuals may be involved in civic life;
VT LEG #385738 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.221
2026 Page 4 of 14
(C) civic dispositions, which includes the acquisition of dispositions;
values such as appreciation for free speech, civil discourse, tolerance, and
inclusion; and an understanding of perspectives that differ from one’s own, as
well as a disposition to be civically engaged; and
(D) civic behavior, which includes the development of behaviors,
including civic habits and practices such as voting, serving on juries,
engagement in deliberative discussions, volunteering, attending public
meetings, and other activities related to civic life.
(4) “Educating for American democracy pedagogical principles” means
the following evidence-based instructional methods:
(A) Excellence for all, which requires teachers to commit to learn
about and teach full and multifaceted history and civic narratives. Teachers
shall appreciate student diversity and assume all students’ capacity for learning
complex and rigorous content. Teachers shall focus on inclusion and equity in
both content and approach as they spiral instruction across grade bands,
increasing complexity and depth about relevant history and contemporary
issues.
(B) Self-reflection and a growth mindset, which requires teachers to
have a growth mindset for themselves and their students, meaning they engage
in continuous self-reflection and cultivate self-knowledge. They learn and
adopt content as well as practices that help all learners of diverse backgrounds
VT LEG #385738 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.221
2026 Page 5 of 14
reach excellence. Teachers need continuous and rigorous professional
development and access to professional learning communities that offer peer
support and mentoring opportunities, especially about content, pedagogical
approaches, and instruction-embedded assessments.
(C) Building and educating for American democracy–ready
classrooms and schools, which requires that teachers cultivate and sustain a
learning environment by partnering with administrators, students, and families
to conduct deep inquiry about the multifaceted stories of American
constitutional democracy. They set the expectation that all students know they
belong and contribute to the classroom community. Students establish
ownership and responsibility for their learning through mutual respect and an
inclusive culture that enables students to engage courageously in rigorous
discussion.
(D) Inquiry as the primary process for learning, which requires
teachers to use inquiry prompts as entry points to teaching full and complex
content and cultivate students’ capacity to develop their own deep and critical
inquiries about American history and civic life, and their identities and
communities. Teachers embrace these rigorous inquiries as a way to advance
students’ historical and civic knowledge, and to connect that knowledge to
them and their communities. They also help students cultivate empathy across
VT LEG #385738 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.221
2026 Page 6 of 14
differences and inquisitiveness to ask difficult questions, which are core to
historical understanding and constructive civic participation.
(E) Practice of constitutional democracy and student agency, which
requires teachers to use their content knowledge and classroom leadership to
model constitutional principles through democratic practices and the
promotion of civic responsibilities, civil rights, and civic friendship in their
classrooms. Teachers deepen students’ grasp of content and concepts by
creating student opportunities to engage with real-world events and problem-
solving related to issues in their communities by taking informed action to
create a more perfect union.
(F) Assess, reflect, and improve, which requires teachers to use
assessments as a tool to ensure all students understand civics content and
concepts and apply civic skills and agency. Students have the opportunity to
reflect on their learning and give feedback to their teachers in higher-order
thinking exercises that enhance as well as measure learning. Teachers analyze
and utilize feedback and assessment for self-reflection and the improvement of
instruction.
(5) “Media literacy” means nonpartisan educational content that
addresses:
(A) digital literacy, which means being technically fluent and able to
make informed decisions about what an individual does and encounters online,
VT LEG #385738 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.221
2026 Page 7 of 14
recognizing how networked technology affects behavior and perceptions, and
creating and effectively communicating with digital media tools;
(B) information literacy, which means understanding how to find,
evaluate, and use information effectively to solve a particular problem or make
a decision;
(C) news literacy, which means the ability to discern verified
information from spin, opinion, and propaganda, and produce news accurately,
fairly, and responsibly;
(D) visual literacy, which means the ability to find, interpret,
evaluate, use, and create images and visual media, such as photographs,
videos, illustrations, drawings, maps, diagrams, and advertisements; and
(E) digital citizenship, which means understanding and following the
norms of safe and responsible technology use.
(6) “Project-based assessment” means a nonpartisan educational civics
project as defined by the Agency that may be individual, small-group, or class-
wide civics projects and that are designed to promote a student’s ability to:
(A) reason, make logical arguments, and support claims using valid
evidence; and
(B) demonstrate an understanding of the connections between
federal, state, and local policies, including issues that may impact the student’s
community.
VT LEG #385738 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.221
2026 Page 8 of 14
(7) “Recognition program” means a civic excellence designation as
defined by the Agency that is aligned with the educating for American
democracy pedagogical principles, with the purpose of formally recognizing
and highlighting the accomplishments of school districts or individual schools.
(b) Civics course time.
(1) In all public schools, the history of the United States of America and
social science, including civics, shall be taught as required subjects to promote
civic service and a greater knowledge thereof and to prepare students, morally
and intellectually, for the duties of citizenship. The Agency shall require
universal, equitable access to high-quality civic learning experiences,
including:
(A) dedicated class time for social studies in each elementary grade,
including:
(i) two 45-minute blocks per week for kindergarten, first- and
second-grade students; and
(ii) four equivalent blocks per week for third-, fourth-, and fifth-
grade students;
(B) a one-semester, stand-alone civics course in middle school; and
(C) a full-year, stand-alone civics course in high school.
(2) Secondary students shall take and pass a stand-alone, full-year civics
course as a prerequisite for graduation from high school.
VT LEG #385738 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.221
2026 Page 9 of 14
(3) Public schools shall also embed units of instruction of media literacy
across subject areas and may consider a stand-alone, semester-long high school
media literacy course.
(c) Project-based assessments.
(1) In addition to instructionally embedded assessments in stand-alone
civics courses, middle and high school students shall engage in a minimum of
one project-based learning, field-based learning, or community-based learning
activity as an alternative form of assessment, such as service learning or
showcases and competitions.
(2) Project-based assessment civic learning projects shall be consistent
with State standards and learning time requirements.
(3) No fee shall be charged to a student or the student’s family for a
student to participate in project-based learning opportunities, notwithstanding
fees already required by schools to participate in school-sponsored field trips,
clubs, or other activities.
(d) Civic seal.
(1) The Agency shall develop and provide student credentialing
benchmarks for use by school districts for the purpose of awarding student
civic seals on high school diplomas to students who have demonstrated civic
excellence through their project-based assessment completed in high school
VT LEG #385738 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.221
2026 Page 10 of 14
and related coursework. School districts and individual schools shall not be
required to participate in the civic seal program.
(2) A school district that participates in the civic seal program shall:
(A) provide information to all students regarding the civic seal
opportunity and criteria for being awarded the recognition;
(B) maintain appropriate records in order to identify students who
have earned the civic seal;
(C) record a student’s civic seal recognition in the student’s official
transcript; and
(D) affix the appropriate insignia to the diploma of each student who
earns the civic seal.
(3) No fee shall be charged for a student to receive the civic seal under
this section.
(e) School and school district recognition program.
(1) The Agency, in collaboration with Vermont’s civic learning
community and civic education researchers, shall develop and establish an
educating for American democracy recognition program to:
(A) recognize school districts and individual schools that show
excellence in producing and promoting civic learning and civic project-based
assessments under this section; and
VT LEG #385738 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.221
2026 Page 11 of 14
(B) provide credentialing benchmarks for schools and school
districts.
(2) The purpose of the program shall be to formally recognize and
highlight the accomplishments of school districts and schools and to provide
teachers and administrators with the components and stages of successful civic
learning.
(3) The Agency shall:
(A) develop an application process for school districts and individual
schools to apply for the recognition program; and
(B) adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to govern the
program created under this subsection (e), which shall:
(i) prioritize school districts and individual schools that promote
equitable access to civic learning and project-based assessments; and
(ii) require schools and school districts that apply to be evaluated
annually.
(4) The Agency shall develop a website to showcase school districts and
individual schools that are recognized for civic excellence and the civics projects
produced by the students of said school districts and individual schools. School
districts and individual schools shall not be required to apply for the recognition
program.
VT LEG #385738 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.221
2026 Page 12 of 14
(5) No fee shall be charged for a school or district to earn recognition
pursuant to this subsection.
(f) The advisory council and Civics Education Special Fund.
(1) Advisory council. The Agency shall establish an advisory council to
oversee the implementation of the Civics Strengthens Democracy Act and to
advise and assist school districts and individual schools in implementing
universal, equitable, comprehensive, and quality civic learning. The
responsibilities of the advisory council may include providing:
(A) technical assistance;
(B) competitive, needs-based funding to districts;
(C) educator professional development;
(D) administrator professional development;
(E) models of best practice;
(F) maintenance of a comprehensive database of civic education
resources; and
(G) monitoring of the fidelity of policy implementation by schools
and districts.
(2) Civics Education Special Fund.
(A) There is established the Civics Education Special Fund, which
shall be managed by the Agency in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 7,
VT LEG #385738 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.221
2026 Page 13 of 14
subchapter 5, to provide funding to school districts for the provision of civics
education under this section.
(B) The Special Fund shall consist of:
(i) revenue from appropriations or other money authorized by the
General Assembly and specifically designated to be credited to the Fund;
(ii) interest earned on such revenues; and
(iii) funds from public and private sources, such as gifts, grants,
and donations, to further civics and history education and professional
development.
(C) Amounts credited to the Civics Education Special Fund shall not
be subject to further appropriation, and any money remaining in the Fund at
the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund.
(D) Amounts received from private sources shall be approved by the
advisory council and subject to review before being deposited in the Civics
Education Special Fund to ensure that pledged funds are not accompanied by
conditions, explicit or implicit, on the implementation of civic programming
that may be detrimental to the neutral and rigorous teaching of civics or unduly
influence the direction of civic education policy. The review shall be made
publicly available.
(3) Report. Notwithstanding 2 V.S.A. § 20(d), annually on or before
November 15, the advisory council shall report to the General Assembly
VT LEG #385738 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.221
2026 Page 14 of 14
regarding the Civics Education Special Fund’s activity. The report shall
include:
(A) the source and amount of funds received;
(B) the amounts distributed and the purpose of expenditures,
including funds expended to assist school districts in meeting the requirements
of the Civics Strengthens Democracy Act;
(C) any grants provided to institutions of higher education and other
stakeholder organizations; and
(D) anticipated revenue and expenditure projections for the next year.
Sec. 4. IMPLEMENTATION
The Agency shall begin implementing the provisions of 16 V.S.A. § 914
during the 2027–2028 school year and shall fully implement the provisions of
this act beginning in the 2028–2029 school year.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385738 v.1